Arkansas, session 2025, HB1133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-43-505, concerning Northwest Technical
Institute, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(c) The Northwest Technical Institute may appoint a president who has
a background in industry in lieu of a background in education.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Northwest Technical
Institute plays an important role in the economy of the state by educating
many of the state's future technical industry workforce; that the Northwest
Technical Institute is currently searching for permanent leadership to lead
and guide this vital work; and that this act is immediately necessary because
current criteria limits who the Northwest Technical Institute can consider
for the open president position that needs to be filled as soon as possible
*CRH073*
01-22-2025 09:14:57 CRH073

As Engrossed: H1/22/25 HB1133
to ensure that the Northwest Technical Institute is able to continue serving
the state and educating the state's future technical industry workforce.
Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately
necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall
become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Unger























01-22-2025 09:14:57 CRH073